California statutes. Education Code
(3) Meets the subject matter knowledge requirements for the credential. If the subject area listed on the out-of-state credential does not correspond to a California subject area, as specified in Sections 44257 and 44282, the commission may require the applicant to meet California subject matter requirements before issuing a clear credential.

(4) Has earned a valid corresponding elementary, secondary, or special education teaching credential based upon the out-of-state teacher preparation program. For the education specialist credential, the commission shall determine the area of concentration based on the special education program completed out of state, or shall allow the candidate to demonstrate the area of concentration based on two years of experience in California, while the candidate holds the
 preliminary credential.

(5) Has successfully completed a criminal background check conducted under Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341 for credentialing purposes.

(b) The commission shall issue a clear multiple subject, single subject, or education specialist teaching credential to an applicant who satisfies the requirements of subdivision (a), provides verification of two or more years of teaching experience, including, but not necessarily limited to, two satisfactory performance evaluations, and documents, in a manner prescribed by the commission, that the applicant has met the state requirements for teaching English learners, including, but not necessarily limited to, the requirements in Section 44253.3 or 44259.5.

(c) For applicants who do not meet the experience requirement described in subdivision (b), the
 commission shall issue a clear multiple subject, single subject, or education specialist teaching credential upon verification of the following requirements:

(1) The commission has issued to the applicant a preliminary five-year teaching credential pursuant to subdivision (a). However, an out-of-state prepared applicant in both special education and general education, who has earned a clear California education specialist credential, shall be granted a clear multiple subject or clear single subject teaching credential without first holding a preliminary multiple subject or single subject teaching credential, unless the commission determines that the applicant does not meet the other requirements of this subdivision.

(2) The applicant has completed a beginning teacher induction program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 44259.

(3) The applicant has met the requirements for teaching English learners, including, but not necessarily limited to, the requirements in Section 44253.3 or 44259.5.

(d) If an out-of-state teaching credential authorizes the credentialholder to teach a commonly taught subject, in addition to the authorization described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), the commission shall issue the multiple subject or single subject teaching credential along with an authorization to teach that subject consistent with subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 44256.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 831, Sec. 3.   (AB 2473)   Effective September 28, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44274.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the commission shall issue a five-year preliminary single subject teaching credential authorizing instruction in departmentalized classes to an individual who satisfies all of the following requirements:

(1) Possesses a valid visiting faculty permit issued pursuant to Section 44300.1.

(2) Submits evidence of two years of recent satisfactory or better performance evaluations from the district while teaching pursuant to a visiting faculty permit.

(3) Satisfies the standards and requirements regarding the instruction of English language learners pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 44259.5.

(4) Satisfies the methodology course requirement in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 44300.1.

(b) An applicant for a credential pursuant to this section is exempt from the basic skills proficiency requirement in Section 44252.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 723, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

44274.4.

Unless the commission determines that substantial evidence exists that the individual is unqualified to teach, upon the recommendation of the governing board of the school district employing the individual, and notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the commission shall issue a five-year professional clear single subject teaching credential authorizing instruction in departmentalized classes to an individual who satisfies all of the following requirements:

(a) Possesses a valid preliminary single subject teaching credential issued pursuant to Section 44274.3.

(b) Submits verification by the employing school district that the individual has completed an individualized
 professional development plan tailored to the needs of the individual teacher and the district that includes mentoring, support, and assistance provided by a credentialed, experienced teacher who teaches the same subject as the applicant. The individualized professional development plan shall include instruction and information about the appropriate academic content standards and curriculum frameworks to enable candidates to provide standards-based instruction and shall also include instruction on working with special populations. For purposes of satisfying the requirements of this section, an applicant may complete a beginning teacher induction program as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 44259.

(c) Submits verification of experience that addresses clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 427, Sec. 9.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

44274.5.

Notwithstanding Section 44227, Section 44259, or any other provision of this chapter, an applicant who holds a valid teaching credential from a state other than California, and who has met, at a minimum, every requirement for a California professional multiple or single subject credential except the requirement of completion of a fifth year of study, may request the commission to determine whether the applicant has completed at least equivalent coursework. If the commission determines that the applicant has completed at least equivalent coursework, the commission shall issue the applicant an appropriate credential, if the applicant has submitted a fingerprint card and has met the requirements of California for teacher fitness by obtaining a certificate of clearance or eligibility, a credential, or a permit from the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 547, Sec. 4.   Effective September 18, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

44275.4.

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that both of the following occur:

(1) That this section provide flexibility to enable school districts to recruit credentialed elementary, secondary, and special education teachers prepared in countries other than the United States to relocate temporarily or permanently to this state.

(2) That any and all teachers prepared in countries other than the United States who are granted a California teaching credential pursuant to this section fully meet the requirements of this state.

(b) Coursework, programs, or degrees completed
 at an institution of higher education outside of the United States are acceptable toward certification when the commission or an evaluating agency approved by the commission determines that the institution’s coursework, programs, or degrees are equivalent to those offered by a regionally accredited institution of higher education in the United States. The commission reserves the right to accept or reject an approved evaluating agency’s determination. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the commission shall issue a five-year preliminary multiple subject teaching credential authorizing instruction in a self-contained classroom, a five-year preliminary single subject teaching credential authorizing instruction in a departmentalized classroom, or a five-year preliminary education specialist credential authorizing instruction of special education pupils to a teacher prepared in a country other than the United States who meets both of the following requirements:

(1) The teacher holds or is eligible for a credential from another country that required a baccalaureate or higher degree determined to be equivalent to those offered by a regionally accredited institution of higher education in the United States and completion of a professional preparation program approved by the appropriate agency in the country where the program was completed that requires the teacher to meet requirements equivalent to the multiple or single subject teaching credential requirements in Section 44259 or the special education credential requirements described in Section 44265. The commission shall determine the area of concentration for the California education specialist credential based on the special education program completed out of country.

(2) The teacher successfully completes a criminal background check conducted pursuant to Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341
 for credentialing purposes.

(c) The commission shall issue a clear multiple subject, single subject, or education specialist teaching credential to a teacher prepared in a country other than the United States who has met the requirements in subdivision (b) and who meets the following requirements:

(1) Demonstration of subject matter competence pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(2) Completion of a course, or for multiple subject and education specialist credentials, a course or an examination, on the various methods of teaching reading pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259. Completion of coursework in another state or country determined by the commission to be comparable and equivalent shall meet this requirement.

(3) Completion of a course or examination on the provisions and principles of the United States Constitution pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259. Completion of coursework in another state or country determined by the commission to be comparable and equivalent shall meet this requirement.

(4) Completion of the study of health education pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259. Completion of coursework in another state or country determined by the commission to be comparable and equivalent shall meet this requirement.

(5) With the exception of the education specialist credential, completion of study and field experience in methods of delivering appropriate educational services to pupils with exceptional needs in regular education programs. Completion of coursework in another state or country determined by the commission to
 be comparable and equivalent shall meet this requirement.

(6) Completion of the study of computer-based technology through demonstration by course or examination of basic competence in the use of computers in the classroom, and study of advanced computer-based technology, including the uses of technology in educational settings pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259. Completion of coursework in another state or country determined by the commission as comparable and equivalent shall meet this requirement.

(7) Completion of a beginning teacher induction program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 44259.

(d) (1) A teacher holding a specialist credential pursuant to this section shall complete the requirements for nonspecial education pedagogy and a
 supervised field experience program in general education pursuant to Section 44265.

(2) A teacher holding a specialist credential pursuant to this section shall complete a program for the Professional Level II credential accredited by the commission.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, the commission shall issue a multiple subject, single subject, or education specialist teaching credential to a teacher prepared in a country other than the United States who has earned a valid corresponding elementary, secondary, or special education teaching credential in another state and who meets the requirements set forth in Section 44274.2. A corresponding elementary, secondary, or special education teaching credential earned in another state shall be deemed to satisfy the teacher preparation program requirements specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section
 44274.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 35.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44275.5.

(a) In addition to the authority granted to the commission under Section 44275.4, the commission may determine that the national standards for coursework, programs, or degrees in a country other than the United States are equivalent to those offered by a regionally accredited institution of higher education in the United States. If the commission determines that the other country’s national standards are equivalent, an individual who holds or is eligible for a credential in that country is presumed to have satisfied the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 44275.4.

(b) The commission may enter into an agreement with an evaluating agency as necessary to make a determination regarding another country’s national standards.

(c) The commission shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section, including regulations that do both of the following:

(1) Establish uniform standards for making a determination regarding another country’s national standards.

(2) Prescribe the procedure by which a determination regarding another country’s national standards shall occur.

(d) (1) The commission shall annually report to the Legislature the list of countries that qualify under this section, the number of credential applications from foreign countries that are approved, and the country of origin of those credential applications.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be
 submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 20.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44275.6.

(a) A school district, county office of education, and charter school shall annually report to the department, in a manner prescribed by the department, the number of visa applications for persons excluded from the term “immigrant,” for purposes of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101), pursuant to Section 1101(a)(15)(H)(i)(b) of Title 8 of the United States Code that the school district, county office of education, or charter school applies for on behalf of potential employees, and the number of those visa applications that are granted.

(b) (1) The department shall annually report the information provided pursuant to subdivision (a) to the
 Legislature.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 16.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44276.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that California’s public school pupils need quality instruction and support in the areas of computer education in order to develop the skills necessary for entry into an increasingly technological society. The Legislature recognizes that computers and other technologies are an integral part of contemporary society and the state educational system.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide a statewide standard for the preparation of educational personnel in the areas of computer education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “computer education” means the process of teaching pupils about computers.

(c) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing, in consultation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, may develop and disseminate voluntary standards for the training and performance of teachers and resource personnel in the area of computer education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44276.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The educational mission of schools may be thwarted when school campuses are not safe, secure, and peaceful.

(2) Effective school management can improve school safety and decrease violence and criminal behavior.

(3) In many school districts and neighborhoods, violence and criminal behavior are increasingly frequent.

(4) Teachers and other educators who are well prepared in principles of school safety may be able to mitigate, to some degree, the detrimental behavior of pupils and others on school campuses.

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that a comprehensive school safety plan be established pursuant to Section 35294.1 in order to achieve safe, secure, and peaceful school campuses. It is the further intent of the Legislature that the Commission on Teacher Credentialing adopt standards that address the principles of school safety in the preparation of future classroom teachers, school administrators, school counselors, and other pupil personnel service providers as a condition for licensing these prospective practitioners.

(c) Standards adopted by the commission pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, and pursuant to Sections 44266, 44270, 44277, and 44372, shall include the effective preparation of prospective classroom teachers, school administrators, school counselors, and other pupil personnel service providers in principles of school safety. In developing these standards, the commission shall consider, but is not limited to considering, the following principles of school safety:

(1) School management skills that emphasize crisis intervention and conflict resolution.

(2) Developing and maintaining a positive and safe school climate, including methods to prevent the possession of weapons on school campuses.

(3) Developing school safety plans.

(4) Developing ways to identify and defuse situations that may lead to conflict or violence.

(d) In developing standards relating to school safety, the commission shall consider the findings and recommendations of an advisory panel of experts on school violence.

(e) The commission shall allow an institution of postsecondary education to meet the standards developed by the commission relating to school safety by incorporating the principles of school safety in the program required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(f) Implementation of subdivision (b) of this section as it applies to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259 shall occur in conjunction with the review of requirements for earning and renewing multiple and single subject teaching credentials, as required by Section 44259.3.

(g) Instruction in principles of school safety shall be required of all candidates for credentials specified in Sections 44259, 44266, and 44270.

(h) A credential that was issued prior to January 1, 1994, shall remain in force as long as it is valid under the laws and regulations that were in effect on the date it was issued. The commission may not, by regulation, invalidate an otherwise valid credential, unless it issues to the holder of the credential, in substitution, a new credential authorized by another provision in this chapter that is no less restrictive than the credential for which it was substituted with respect to the kind of service authorized and the grades, classes, or types of schools in which it authorizes service.

(i) Notwithstanding this section, persons who were performing teaching, administrative, counseling, or other pupil personnel services as of January 1, 1994, pursuant to the language of this chapter that was in effect prior to that date, may continue to perform those services without complying with any requirements added by the amendments adding this section.

(j) The commission shall grant credentials based on the requirements for those credentials as of December 31, 1993, to candidates who, prior to the effective date of the commission’s adoption of standards pursuant to this section, were in the process of meeting those credential requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 423, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

44276.6.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Commission on Teacher Credentialing not duplicate the efforts of the State Department of Education, Office of Criminal Justice Planning, Department of the Youth Authority, and the School/Law Enforcement Partnership in undertaking leadership activities directed toward establishing appropriate standards of preparation for teachers and other certificated personnel concerning violent behavior by pupils. The commission shall consult with these agencies and consider policies, programs, guidelines, other resource and training materials, and experts, which these agencies have identified, funded, or developed to reduce violent behavior by pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44277.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that effective professional growth must continue to occur throughout the careers of all teachers, in order that teachers remain informed of changes in pedagogy, subject matter, and pupil needs. In enacting this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage teachers to engage in an individual program of professional growth that extends their content knowledge and teaching skills and for school districts to establish professional growth programs that give individual teachers a wide range of options to pursue as well as significant roles in determining the course of their professional growth.

(b) An individual program of professional growth may consist of activities that are aligned with the California Standards for the
 Teaching Profession that contribute to competence, performance, or effectiveness in the profession of education and the classroom assignments of the teacher. Acceptable activities may include, among other acceptable activities, the completion of courses offered by regionally accredited institutions of higher education, including instructor-led interactive courses delivered through online technologies; participation in professional conferences, workshops, teacher center programs, staff development programs, or a California Reading Professional Development Institute program operated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 99220) of Chapter 5 of Part 65 of Division 14 of Title 3; service as a mentor teacher; participation in school curriculum development projects; participation in systematic programs of observation and analysis of teaching; service in a leadership role in a professional organization; and participation in educational research or innovation efforts. Employing agencies and the bargaining
 agents of employees may negotiate to agree on the terms of programs of professional growth within their jurisdictions, provided that the agreements shall be consistent with this section.

(c) An individual program of professional growth may include a basic course in cardiopulmonary resuscitation, which includes training in the subdiaphragmatic abdominal thrust (also known as the “Heimlich maneuver”) and meets or exceeds the standards established by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross for courses in that subject or minimum standards for training programs established by the Emergency Medical Services Authority. An individual program of professional growth may also include a course in first aid that meets or exceeds the standards established by the American Red Cross for courses in that subject or minimum standards for training programs established by the Emergency Medical Services Authority.

(d) (1) If a local educational agency offers a program of professional growth for teachers, administrators, paraprofessional educators, or other classified employees involved in the direct instruction of pupils, the local educational agency shall evaluate professional learning based on all of the following criteria, and the local educational agency is encouraged to choose professional learning that meets any of the following criteria:

(A) Helps attract, grow, and retain effective educators.

(B) Is a part of every educator’s experience in order to accelerate instructional improvement and support pupil learning.

(C) Is based on needs assessment of educators and tied to supporting pupil learning.

(D) Emphasizes the importance of meeting the needs of all pupils.

(E) Is grounded in a description of effective practice, as articulated in the California Standards for the Teaching Profession.

(F) Affords educators opportunities to engage with others to develop their craft, including, but not limited to, opportunities to increase their content knowledge.

(G) Ensures educators have adequate time to learn about, practice, reflect, adjust, critique, and share what educators need to ensure that all pupils, especially high-needs pupils, develop knowledge and lifelong learning skills that will help the pupils to be successful.

(H) Recognizes and uses expert teaching and leadership skills.

(I) Attends to collective growth needs as well as educators’ individual growth needs.

(J) Contributes to a positive, collaborative, and supportive adult learning environment.

(K) Contributes to cycles of inquiry and improvement.

(L) Is not limited to a single instance, but supports educators through multiple iterations or engagements.

(M) Is based on a coherent and focused plan.

(2) Professional learning activities may also include collaboration time for teachers to develop new instructional lessons, to select or develop common formative assessments, to analyze pupil data, for mentoring projects for new teachers, or for extra
 support for teachers to improve practice. Appropriate professional learning may be part of a coherent plan that combines school activities within the school, including, but not necessarily limited to, lesson study or coteaching, and external learning opportunities that meet all of the following criteria:

(A) Are related to the academic subjects taught.

(B) Provide time to meet and work with other teachers.

(C) Support instruction and pupil learning to improve instruction in a manner that is consistent with academic content standards.

(e) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 21.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Marian Bergeson Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment System [44279.1. - 44279.7.]

44279.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the beginning years of the career of a teacher are a critical time in which it is necessary that intensive professional development and assessment occur. The Legislature recognizes that the public invests heavily in the preparation of prospective teachers, and that more than one-half of all new teachers leave some California school districts after one or two years in the classroom. Intensive professional development and assessment are necessary to build on the preparation that precedes initial certification, to transform academic preparation into practical success in the classroom, to retain greater numbers of capable beginning teachers, and to remove novices who show little promise as teachers. It is
 the intent of the Legislature that the commission and the Superintendent develop and implement policies to govern the support and assessment of beginning teachers, as a condition for the professional certification of those teachers in the future.

(b) There is hereby established the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment System, to be administered jointly by the commission and the Superintendent. In administering the system, the commission and the Superintendent shall approve the most cost-effective programs of support and assessment. The commission and the Superintendent also shall ensure that programs meet the Standards of Quality and Effectiveness for Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment Programs adopted by the commission and that local programs support beginning teachers in meeting the competencies described in the California Standards for the Teaching Profession adopted by the commission. The system shall do all of the
 following:

(1) Provide an effective transition into the teaching career for first-year and second-year teachers in California.

(2) Improve the educational performance of pupils through improved training, information, and assistance for new teachers.

(3) Enable beginning teachers to be effective in teaching pupils who are culturally, linguistically, and academically diverse.

(4) Ensure the professional success and retention of new teachers.

(5) Ensure that a support provider provides intensive individualized support and assistance to each participating beginning teacher.

(6) Improve the rigor and consistency of individual
 teacher performance assessments and the usefulness of assessment results to teachers and decisionmakers.

(7) Establish an effective, coherent system of performance assessments that are based on the California Standards for the Teaching Profession adopted by the commission.

(8) Examine alternative ways in which the general public and the educational profession may be assured that new teachers who remain in teaching have attained acceptable levels of professional competence.

(9) Ensure that an individual induction plan is in place for each participating beginning teacher and is based on an ongoing assessment of the development of the beginning teacher.

(10) Ensure continuous program improvement through ongoing research, development, and evaluation.

(c) Participation in the system shall be voluntary for teachers, school districts, and county offices of education and participation by certificated employees shall not be made a condition of employment. The commission and the Superintendent shall adopt and implement criteria and standards for participation in the system, including criteria regarding the eligibility of teachers and standards of local program quality and intensity for schools, school districts, county offices of education, colleges, universities, and other educational and professional organizations. The criteria and standards shall be consistent with the purposes of the system.

(d) (1) For purposes of this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “beginning teacher” means a teacher with a valid California credential, as defined in Section 44259.

(2) For purposes of this article, “beginning teacher” does not include a teacher with a life or a clear teaching credential who returns to serve in a certificated teaching position.

(e) Subject to verification and approval by an induction program director, a beginning teacher shall not be required to demonstrate that an induction standard has been met, or complete an element of an approved induction program designed to assist a candidate in mastering a given standard, if the candidate previously met the induction standard while participating in a commission-approved preparation program.

(f) The Superintendent and the commission shall disseminate the California Standards for the Teaching Profession adopted by the commission to colleges, universities, school districts, county offices of education, and professional
 associations, who shall be encouraged to use the standards in efforts to improve teacher preparation and support programs. Performance assessments developed under this article shall be designed to provide useful, helpful feedback to beginning teachers and their support providers. That information shall not be used for employment-related evaluations, as a condition of employment, or as a basis for terminating employment.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission and the Superintendent establish a statewide teacher induction program that supports locally designed, high-quality induction programs that provide individualized support and formative assessment for all participating beginning teachers as defined in subdivision (d). At the discretion of the local beginning teacher support and assessment system teacher induction program, funds allocated to a program on the basis of eligible beginning teachers may be used to provide
 support, assistance, and preparation services to other credential candidates who are in their first or second year of employment as a classroom teacher.

(h) This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Marian Bergeson Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 348, Sec. 2.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

44279.2.

(a) The Superintendent and the commission shall jointly administer the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment System pursuant to this chapter. In administering this section, the Superintendent and the commission shall provide or contract for the provision of all of the following:

(1) Establishing requirements for reviewing and approving teacher induction programs.

(2) Developing and administering a system for ensuring teacher induction program quality and effectiveness. For purposes of this section, “program
 effectiveness” means producing excellent program outcomes in relation to the purposes defined in subdivision (b) of Section 44279.1. For purposes of this section, “program quality” means excellence with respect to program factors, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Program goals.

(B) Design resources.

(C) Management, evaluation, and improvement of the program.

(D) School context and working conditions.

(E) Support and assessment services to each beginning teacher.

(3) Developing purposes and functions for reviewing
 and approving supplemental grants and standards for program clusters and program consultants, as defined pursuant to Section 44279.7.

(4) Improving and refining the formative assessment system.

(5) Improving and refining professional development materials and strategies for all personnel involved in implementing induction programs.

(6) Conducting and tracking research related to beginning teacher induction.

(7) Periodically evaluating the validity of the California Standards for the Teaching Profession adopted by the commission and the Standards of Quality and Effectiveness for Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment Program adopted by the commission and making changes to those documents, as necessary.

(b) As part of the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment System, the commission and the Superintendent shall establish requirements for local teacher induction programs.

(c) A school district or consortium of school districts may apply to the Superintendent for funding to establish a local teacher induction program pursuant to this section. From amounts appropriated for purposes of this section, the Superintendent shall allocate three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each beginning teacher participating in the program. That amount shall be adjusted each fiscal year by the inflation factor set forth in Section 42238.1. To be eligible to receive funding, a school district or consortium of school districts shall, at a minimum, meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Develop, implement, and evaluate teacher induction programs that meet the Quality and Effectiveness for Beginning Teacher Induction Program Standards adopted by the commission.

(2) Support beginning teachers in meeting the competencies described in the California Standards for the Teaching Profession adopted by the commission.

(3) Meet criteria for the cost-effective delivery of program services.

(4) From amounts received from local, state, or resources available for purposes of teacher induction programs, contribute not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) for the costs of each beginning teacher served in the induction program.

(d) Teachers who have received their preliminary credential in a district intern program pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44325) or an intern program pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 44450) of Chapter 3 and who are participating in an induction program pursuant to this section are not eligible for funding pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 44380) of Chapter 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 348, Sec. 3.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

44279.25.

(a) By December 1, 2007, the Superintendent and the commission shall report to the Legislature and the Governor on the current state of the Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment System. The report shall review the articulation of teacher preparation programs and teacher induction programs to eliminate duplicative requirements and, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Recommend revisions to laws, regulations, or policies to eliminate duplicative requirements between teacher preparation and teacher induction programs, with particular attention paid to eliminating duplication between induction requirements and requirements for completion of state-approved alternative certification programs.

(2) Recommend revisions to the system to ensure that teacher credential candidates achieve teaching competence and programs use best practices to transition candidates from teacher preparation programs to induction programs.

(3) Recommend ways to ensure that beginning teachers receive direct assistance from experienced teachers who are familiar with the grade span, subject matter, and teaching and classroom management techniques appropriate to the teaching assignment of each beginning teacher.

(b) By July 1, 2008, the Superintendent and the commission shall review and revise, as necessary, the Standards of Quality and Effectiveness for Professional Teacher Induction Programs of March 2002 to ensure that these standards address the application of knowledge and skills previously acquired in a preliminary credential program and to remove any requirements or activities that require candidates to duplicate the acquisition of knowledge through coursework. This review shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A review of formative assessment systems in use to ensure that the systems are appropriately flexible and may be adapted to reflect progress of individual candidates.

(2) A review of professional development provided to induction participants to ensure that it is not duplicative of coursework completed during teacher preparation.

(3) A review of new teacher support to ensure that the focus is on application and enhancement of skills and knowledge acquired in a preliminary credential program.

(4) Recommendations for program monitoring with respect to this subdivision.

(c) In consultation with the Superintendent, the commission shall revise the formative assessment system for beginning teachers, as necessary to ensure that related tasks and activities are aligned to the revised standards.
